Utah statutes.
53A-4-205.   Establishment of public education foundations -- Powers and duties -- Tax exempt status.

(1)  The State Board of Education, a local school  board, or the Utah Schools for the Deaf and Blind may establish foundations to:

(a)  assist in the development and implementation of the programs authorized under this part to promote educational excellence; and

(b)  assist in the accomplishment of other education-related objectives.

(2)  A foundation established under Subsection (1):

(a)  may solicit and receive contributions from private enterprises for the purpose of this part;

(b)  shall comply with Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act, and rules made under the act;

(c)  has no power or authority to incur contractual obligations or liabilities that constitute a claim against public funds except as provided in this section;

(d)  may not exercise executive, administrative, or rulemaking authority over the programs referred to in this part, except to the extent specifically authorized by the responsible school board;

(e)  is exempt from all taxes levied by the state or any of its political subdivisions with respect to activities conducted under this part;

(f)  may participate in the Risk Management Fund under Section 63A-4-204;

(g)  shall provide a school with information detailing transactions and balances of funds managed for that school;

(h)  shall, for foundation accounts from which money is distributed to schools, provide all the schools within a school district information that:

(i)  details account transactions; and

(ii)  shows available balances in the accounts; and

(i)  may not:

(i)  engage in lobbying activities;

(ii)  attempt to influence legislation; or

(iii)  participate in any campaign activity for or against:

(A)  a political candidate; or

(B)  an initiative, referendum, proposed constitutional amendment, bond, or any other ballot proposition submitted to the voters.

(3)  A local school board that establishes a foundation under Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  require the foundation to:

(i)  use the school district's accounting system; or

(ii)  follow written accounting policies established by the board;

(b)  review and approve the foundation's accounting, purchasing, and check issuance policies to ensure that there is an adequate separation of responsibilities; and

(c)  approve procedures to verify that issued foundation payments have been properly approved.



Amended by Chapter 280, 2011 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 342, 2011 General Session

